Virginia statutes. Title 24.2. Elections.
Article 5. Campaign Telephone Call Requirements.

§ 24.2-959.
Requirements for campaign telephone calls sponsored by a candidate or candidate campaign committee.

It shall be unlawful for any candidate or candidate campaign committee to make campaign telephone calls without disclosing, before the conclusion of each telephone call, information to identify the candidate or candidate campaign committee who has authorized and is paying for the calls unless such call is terminated prematurely by means beyond the maker’s control.

The person making the telephone call shall disclose the name of the candidate.

It shall be unlawful for any candidate or candidate campaign committee making campaign telephone calls to intentionally modify the caller identification information of any campaign telephone call for the purpose of misleading the recipient as to the identity of the caller. If the call is made from an automatic dialing-announcing device and caller identification information includes a name associated with the telephone number, then the caller identification information shall include either the name of the candidate or candidate campaign committee as it appears on the statement of organization that has authorized and is paying for the calls, or the vendor conducting the calls on behalf of the candidate or candidate campaign committee. “Automatic dialing-announcing device” means the same as that term is defined in § 59.1-518.1.

It shall also be unlawful (i) for any candidate or candidate campaign committee who contracts for campaign telephone calls to fail to provide to the persons making the telephone calls the identifying information required by this section or (ii) for any person to provide a false or fictitious name or address when providing the identifying information required.

History.

2000, c. 874, §

24.2-1014.1

; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 323; 2020, c. 615.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, c. 615, cl. 3 provides: “That print media advertisements paid for or distributed prior to the effective date of this act shall not be subject to the provisions of this act.”

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 323 inserted the third paragraph.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 615, effective January 1, 2021, inserted “as it appears on the statement of organization” in the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).

§ 24.2-959.1.
Requirements for campaign telephone calls sponsored by a political committee or person other than a candidate or candidate campaign committee.

It shall be unlawful for any person or political committee to make campaign telephone calls without disclosing, before the conclusion of each telephone call, information to identify the person or political committee who has authorized and is paying for the calls unless such call is terminated prematurely by means beyond the maker’s control.

The person making the telephone call shall disclose the following identifying information: the name of the political committee if the calls are authorized by that committee or an agent of that committee; and in the case of a committee that has filed a statement of organization under Chapter 9.3 (§

24.2-945

et seq.), the full name of the committee and a registration number provided by the State Board; or in any other case, the full name and residence address of the individual responsible for the campaign telephone calls.

It shall be unlawful for any person, corporation, or political committee making campaign telephone calls to intentionally modify the caller identification information for the purpose of misleading the recipient as to the identity of the caller. If the call is made from an automatic dialing-announcing device and caller identification information includes a name associated with the telephone number, then the caller identification information shall include either the name of the person, corporation, or political committee that has authorized and is paying for the calls or the vendor conducting the calls on behalf of the person, corporation, or political committee. “Automatic dialing-announcing device” means the same as that term is defined in § 59.1-518.1.

It shall also be unlawful (i) for any person who contracts for campaign telephone calls to fail to provide to the persons making the telephone calls the identifying information required by this section or (ii) for any person to provide a false or fictitious name or address when providing the identifying information required.

History.

2000, c. 874, §

24.2-1014.1

; 2006, cc. 787, 892; 2010, c. 323.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 323 inserted the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, “Election Law and Government,” see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 119 (2011).